Hawaii, session 2025, SB1165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  The department of health shall determine standards for safe levels of nicotine in products available for sale to Hawaii residents to ensure the prevention of addiction.  The department of health may adopt rules necessary to effectuate the purposes of this subsection in accordance with chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes. (b)  The department of commerce and consumer affairs shall restrict the sale of any products sold in the State that contain levels of nicotine that exceed the standards determined or rules adopted by the department of health pursuant to subsection (a).  The department of commerce and consumer affairs may adopt rules necessary to effectuate the purposes of this subsection in accordance with chapter 91, Hawaii Revised Statutes. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________